Maine, session 132, LD2204.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1001, sub-§9, as amended by PL 2021, c. 295, §3 and c. 320,
§2, is further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
A student may be readmitted on satisfactory evidence that the behavior that was the cause
of the student being expelled will not likely recur. The school board may authorize the
principal to suspend students up to a maximum of 10 days for infractions of school rules,
except that the school board may not authorize the principal to issue an out-of-school
suspension to a student who is enrolled in grade 5 or below except as provided under
subsection 9-A or 9-E or unless the principal determines that there is an imminent danger
of serious physical injury to the student or others and less restrictive interventions would
be ineffective. An out-of-school suspension for a student who is enrolled in grade 5 or
below may not exceed 3 days, except as provided under subsection 9-E. The school board
may authorize the superintendent or principal to modify, in writing, the requirement for
expulsion of a student on a case-by-case basis. In addition to other powers and duties under
this subsection, the school board may develop a policy requiring a student who is in
violation of school substance use or possession rules to participate in substance use disorder
services as provided in section 6606. Nothing in this This subsection or and subsection 9‑C
prevents do not prevent a school board from providing educational services in an alternative
setting to a student who has been expelled.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §1001, sub-§9-E is enacted to read:
9-E. Students expelled for sexual assault. A school board shall adopt a policy for
expelling a student enrolled in any grade who is determined to have committed sexual
assault as described in Title 17-A, chapter 11 on school grounds or other school property
and for referring the matter to the appropriate local law enforcement agency.
A. A student who is determined to have committed sexual assault must be expelled
from school for a period of not less than one year, except that a school board may
authorize the superintendent to modify in writing the requirement for expulsion of a
student on a case-by-case basis. A decision to change the placement of a student with
a disability must be made in accordance with the federal Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, 20 United States Code, Section 1400 et seq.
B. This subsection does not prevent a school board from providing educational
services in an alternative setting to a student who has been expelled.
C. In accordance with the proper investigation and due process provisions required in
subsection 9, a principal may suspend immediately for good cause a student who is
determined to have committed sexual assault on school grounds or other school
property under this subsection.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §1001, sub-§15, ¶J, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 295, §4, is
amended to read:
J. Establish that an out-of-school suspension or expulsion may not be issued to a
student in grade 5 or below except as provided under subsection 9 or, 9‑A or 9-E or
unless the principal determines that there is an imminent danger of serious physical
injury to the student or others and less restrictive interventions would be ineffective;
and
Page 1 - 132LR2978(01)

Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §1001, sub-§15, ¶K, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 295, §4, is
amended to read:
K. Establish that an out-of-school suspension for a student in grade 5 or below may
not exceed 3 days, except as provided under subsection 9-E.